South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4514.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 44-41-37 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 44-41-37.  A physician or other professional person or agency counseling or discussing with a minor the question of her obtaining an abortion shall fully inform her of the procedures she must follow under law to obtain an abortion without the consent required in Section 44-41-31(1). The Adoption and Birth Parent Services Division of the Department of Social Services shall develop and distribute brochures to health and education professionals for use in counseling pregnant minors. This brochure shall include the following: (1) how to access her local health department for prenatal care; (2) how to access her local Adoption and Birth Parent Services Division of the Department of Social Services or any private not for profit adoption service; (3) the parental consent requirement as outlined in this bill; and (4) the judicial by-pass procedure as referred in Sections 44-41-32, 44-41-33, and 44-41-34;  and (5)(4) how to access her local mental health center for counseling services. SECTION 2.  Sections 44-41-32, 44-41-33, and 44-41-34 of the S.C. Code are repealed. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----